Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201887-804
Compliance with notice requirements; manner.

(1) An individual or a commercial entity that maintains its own notice procedures which are part of an information security policy for the treatment of personal information and which are otherwise consistent with the timing requirements of section 87-803, is deemed to be in compliance with the notice requirements of section 87-803 if the individual or the commercial entity notifies affected Nebraska residents and the Attorney General in accordance with its notice procedures in the event of a breach of the security of the system.

(2) An individual or a commercial entity that is regulated by state or federal law and that maintains procedures for a breach of the security of the system pursuant to the laws, rules, regulations, guidances, or guidelines established by its primary or functional state or federal regulator is deemed to be in compliance with section 87-803 if the individual or commercial entity notifies affected Nebraska residents and the Attorney General in accordance with the maintained procedures in the event of a breach of the security of the system.

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 29.